Massachusetts, session 194th, H5046.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:
Section 222A
The department shall direct and assist the Massachusetts Interscholastic Athletic
Association in developing policies and procedures pertaining to requiring high school athletes to
complete at least one electrocardiogram screening prior to participation in interscholastic athletic
competition beginning in the 2026-2027 school year. MIAA policy shall include, but not be
limited to: student athlete compliance; protocol following an abnormal electrocardiogram result;
religious exemption; and transferability of results.
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 17Z the following section:-
of 3

Section 17AA. Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee
of the commonwealth, insured under the Group Insurance Commission, shall provide coverage
for one electrocardiogram screening for high school aged MIAA athletes.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting before section 47CCC the following section:-
Section 47AAA. Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued,
delivered or renewed within the commonwealth that provides medical expense coverage shall
provide coverage for one electrocardiogram screening for high school aged MIAA athletes.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 8DDD the following section:-
Section 8EEE. Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual
or group hospital service plan which is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth
shall provide coverage for one electrocardiogram screening for high school aged MIAA athletes.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 4DDD the following section:-
Section 4EEE. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement delivered, issued, or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for
one electrocardiogram screening for high school aged MIAA athletes.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 4VV the following section:-
of 3

Section 4WW. Any individual or group health maintenance contract shall provide
coverage for one electrocardiogram screening for high school aged MIAA athletes.
of 3